District of Columbia statutes.
50-351

Repealed

Payment of taxicab charge.

Repealed.

Feb. 26, 1981, D.C. Law 3-117, § 2, 27 DCR 5636
Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 3, 59 DCR 9431
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 261, 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 43-314.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 261 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

D.C. Law 19-317 purported to amend this section, but the act became effective after this section’s repeal. D.C. Law 19-317 would have substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “of not more than $300”.

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.